Washington statutes.
RCW 43.117.030

Commission established.

There is established a Washington state commission on Asian Pacific American affairs in the office of the governor. The now existing Asian American advisory council shall become the commission upon enactment of this chapter. The council may transfer all office equipment, including files and records to the commission.

[ 1995 c 67 s 4; 1974 ex.s. c 140 s 3.]